District of Columbia statutes.
50-2352

Autonomous vehicles permitted.

An autonomous vehicle may operate on a public roadway; provided, that the vehicle:

(1)

Has a manual override feature that allows a driver to assume control of the autonomous vehicle at any time;

(2)

Has a driver seated in the control seat of the vehicle while in operation who is prepared to take control of the autonomous vehicle at any moment; and

(3)

Is capable of operating in compliance with the District’s applicable traffic laws and motor vehicle laws and traffic control devices.

Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-278, § 3, 60 DCR 2119